Nebraska, session 109, LB1099.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1099 LB1099
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-3,163.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is amended to read:
60-3,163.02 The department shall issue the following types of
alternate license plates pursuant to this section and sections 60-3,104,
60-3,163, and 60-3,163.01:
(1) Arbor Day Plates. The department shall design such license
plates in consultation with the Nebraska Statewide Arboretum and a
nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code with a mission to inspire people
to plant, nurture, and celebrate trees. The design of such plates shall
represent the history and importance of Arbor Day in Nebraska. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Arbor Day
Plates is the Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund. A person may apply for
Arbor Day Plates beginning on January 1, 2026;
(2) Breast Cancer Awareness Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to include a pink ribbon and the words "early detection
saves lives" along the bottom of the license plate. The designated
recipient for alternate license plate fees for Breast Cancer Awareness
Plates is the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the breast cancer
navigator program;
(3) Choose Life License Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to reflect support for the protection of Nebraska's
children. The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Choose Life License Plates is the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to
supplement federal funds available to the Department of Health and Human
Services for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, 42
U.S.C. 601 et seq.;
(4) Czech Heritage Plates. The department, in consultation with the
Czech Honorary Consul of Nebraska, shall design such license plates to
reflect Czech heritage in Nebraska. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Czech Heritage Plates is the Department
-2-

LB1099 LB1099
2026 2026
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund;
(5) Donate Life Plates. The department shall design such license
plates to reflect support for organ and tissue donation, registration as
a donor on the Donor Registry of Nebraska, and the federally designated
organ procurement organization for Nebraska. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Donate Life Plates is the Organ and
Tissue Donor Awareness and Education Fund;
(6) Down Syndrome Awareness Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to include the words "Down syndrome awareness" inside a
heart-shaped yellow and blue ribbon. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Down Syndrome Awareness Plates is the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for the Down Syndrome Clinic;
(7) Husker Red License Plates. The department shall design such
license plates so that (a) a scarlet-colored background covers the entire
front of the license plates and (b) the license plate designations use
cream-colored characters. The designated recipient for alternate license
plate fees for Husker Red License Plates is the Highway Cash Fund. A
person may apply for Husker Red License Plates beginning on January 1,
2027;
(8) (7) Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates. The department
shall design such license plates to include a blue background with the
head of an otter surfacing above water surrounded by the words "Josh the
Otter-Be Safe Around Water". The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates is the
Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Cash Fund;
(9) (8) Mountain Lion Conservation Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to reflect support for the conservation of the
mountain lion population. The designated recipient for alternate license
plate fees for Mountain Lion Conservation Plates is the Game and Parks
Commission Educational Fund;
(10) (9) Native American Cultural Awareness and History Plates. The
-3-

LB1099 LB1099
2026 2026
department, in consultation with the Commission on Indian Affairs, shall
design license plates that reflect the unique culture and history of
Native American tribes historically and currently located in Nebraska.
The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Native
American Cultural Awareness and History Plates is the Native American
Scholarship and Leadership Fund;
(11)(a) (10)(a) Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates. The department
shall design such license plates to (i) include the word "Cornhuskers" or
"Huskers" prominently in the design, (ii) use scarlet and cream colors in
the design or such other similar colors as the department determines to
best represent the official team colors of the University of Nebraska
Cornhuskers athletic programs and to provide suitable reflection and
contrast, (iii) use cream or a similar color for the background of the
design and scarlet or a similar color for the printing, and (iv) create a
design reflecting support for the University of Nebraska Cornhuskers
athletic programs in consultation with the University of Nebraska-Lincoln
Athletic Department.
(b) Alphanumeric Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall (i) be
consecutively numbered beginning with the number one and use numbers that
are a size that maximizes legibility, and (ii) not use a county
designation or any characters other than numbers on the spirit plates.
(c) Personalized message Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall be
issued subject to the same conditions specified for personalized message
license plates in subsection (2) of section 60-3,118. The characters used
shall consist only of letters, numerals, or a combination of letters and
numerals of the same size and design specified in section 60-3,100. A
maximum of seven characters may be used.
(d) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of Nebraska
Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of seventy
dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of
-4-

LB1099 LB1099
2026 2026
the fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and forty percent
of the fee to the designated recipient for alternate license plate fees.
(e) The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates is the Highway Trust Fund;
(12) (11) Nebraska History Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with the Nebraska State Historical Society
to reflect the importance of historical preservation in Nebraska and the
value of our shared Nebraska history. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Nebraska History Plates is the Support
Nebraska History Cash Fund;
(13) (12) Pets for Vets Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to support veterans and companion or therapy pet animals.
The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Pets for
Vets Plates is the Pets for Vets Cash Fund;
(14) (13) Prostate Cancer Awareness Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to include a light blue ribbon and the words
"early detection saves lives" along the bottom of the license plate. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Prostate Cancer
Awareness Plates is the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the
Nebraska Prostate Cancer Research Program;
(15) (14) Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer
awareness. The department shall design such license plates to include a
blue handprint over a yellow ribbon and the words "childhood cancer
awareness". The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer awareness is the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for pediatric cancer research;
(16) (15) Support the Arts Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with the Nebraska Arts Council to reflect
support for the arts in Nebraska. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support the Arts Plates is the Support the Arts
Cash Fund;
-5-

LB1099 LB1099
2026 2026
(17)(a) (16)(a) Support Our Troops Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to reflect support for troops from all
branches of the armed forces. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support Our Troops Plates is the Veterans
Employment Program Fund.
(b)(i) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of
alphanumeric Support Our Troops Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of
five dollars. The State Treasurer shall credit five dollars of the fee to
the designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Support Our
Troops Plates.
(ii) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of
personalized message Support Our Troops Plates shall be accompanied by a
fee of seventy dollars. Twenty-five percent of such fee shall be credited
to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of
such fee shall be credited to the designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support Our Troops Plates;
(18) (17) The Good Life Is Outside Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to reflect the importance of safe walking and
biking in Nebraska and the value of our recreational trails. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for The Good Life
Is Outside Plates is the Game and Parks State Park Improvement and
Maintenance Fund for the purpose of trail improvement and maintenance;
and
(19) (18) Wildlife Conservation Plates. The department shall create
no more than three designs for such license plates to reflect support for
the conservation of Nebraska wildlife, including sandhill cranes, bighorn
sheep, and ornate box turtles. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Wildlife Conservation Plates is the Wildlife
Conservation Fund.
Sec. 2. Section 66-4,100, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-6-

LB1099 LB1099
2026 2026
66-4,100 (1) The Highway Cash Fund and the Roads Operations Cash
Fund are hereby created. Such funds may include money credited from any
source, including section 60-3,163.02. If bonds are issued pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 39-2223, the balance of the share of the
Highway Trust Fund allocated to the Department of Transportation and
deposited into the Highway Restoration and Improvement Bond Fund as
provided in subsection (8) of section 39-2215 and the balance of the
money deposited in the Highway Restoration and Improvement Bond Fund as
provided in section 39-2215.01 shall be transferred by the State
Treasurer, on or before the last day of each month, to the Highway Cash
Fund. If no bonds are issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section
39-2223, the share of the Highway Trust Fund allocated to the Department
of Transportation shall be transferred by the State Treasurer on or
before the last day of each month to the Highway Cash Fund.
(2) The Legislature may direct the State Treasurer to transfer funds
from the Highway Cash Fund to the Roads Operations Cash Fund. Both funds
shall be expended by the department for:
(a) Acquiring (1) for acquiring real estate, road materials,
equipment, and supplies to be used in the construction, reconstruction,
improvement, and maintenance of state highways; ,
(b) The (2) for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, and
maintenance of state highways, including grading, drainage, structures,
surfacing, roadside development, landscaping, and other incidentals
necessary for proper completion and protection of state highways as the
department shall, after investigation, find and determine shall be for
the best interests of the highway system of the state, either independent
of or in conjunction with federal-aid money for highway purposes; ,
(c) The (3) for the share of the department of the cost of
maintenance of state aid bridges; ,
(d) Planning (4) for planning studies in conjunction with federal
highway funds for the purpose of analyzing traffic problems and financial
-7-

LB1099 LB1099
2026 2026
conditions and problems relating to state, county, township, municipal,
federal, and all other roads in the state and for incidental costs in
connection with the federal-aid grade crossing program for roads not on
state highways; ,
(e) Tests (5) for tests and research by the department or
proportionate costs of membership, tests, and research of highway
organizations when participated in by the highway departments of other
states; ,
(f) The (6) for the payment of expenses and costs of the Board of
Examiners for County Highway and City Street Superintendents as set forth
in section 39-2310; ,
(g) Support (7) for support of the public transportation assistance
program established under section 13-1209 and the intercity bus system
assistance program established under section 13-1213; ,
(h) Purchasing (8) for purchasing from political or governmental
subdivisions or public corporations, pursuant to section 39-1307, any
federal-aid transportation funds available to such entities; ,
(i) Costs (9) for costs related to the administration of the
Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation as specified
in section 3-107; ,
(j) Furnishing (10) for furnishing the Nebraska Broadband Office
with necessary office space, furniture, equipment, and supplies as well
as providing administrative and budgetary support, including salaries for
professional, technical, and clerical assistants, as provided in section
81-702; , and
(k) The (11) for the County Bridge Match Program.
The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the
Roads Operations Cash Fund to the Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund
on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services. The money shall be used for the County Bridge
-8-

LB1099 LB1099
2026 2026
Match Program. The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars
from the Roads Operations Cash Fund to the Transportation Infrastructure
Bank Fund on or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services. The money shall be used for the
County Bridge Match Program.
(3) Any money in the Highway Cash Fund and the Roads Operations Cash
Fund not needed for current operations of the department shall, as
directed by the Director-State Engineer to the State Treasurer, be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, subject to
approval by the board of each investment. All income received as a result
of such investment shall be placed in the Highway Cash Fund.
Sec. 3. Original section 66-4,100, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 60-3,163.02, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-9-